Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462.357, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1j. new text end new text begin Homestead rentals. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this subdivision, "homestead" has the meaning provided in section 273.124, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) A municipality must not prohibit an owner from renting or leasing a portion of the owner's homestead property as a dwelling if: new text end new text begin (1) the homestead is a single family home; and new text end new text begin (2) the owner resides on the homestead property as the owner's primary dwelling. new text end new text begin (c) Rental of a portion of a homestead property pursuant to paragraph (b) is a permitted single family use for the purposes of zoning. new text end new text begin (d) Paragraph (b) does not prohibit a municipality from enforcing other laws, rules, regulations, and ordinances relating to residential rental properties, including landlord-tenant law. new text end